Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 90.30 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
June 12 of each year is hereby designated as "Oklahoma Women
Veterans History Day" in Oklahoma. All citizens of this state are
requested to devote some portion of Oklahoma Women Veterans History
Day to honor all the women who have served in any capacity as a
member of the Armed Forces of the United States.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
Req. No. 12216 Page 1

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
60-1-12216 TKR 01/16/25
Req. No. 12216 Page 2